Maryland, session 2026, HB1428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–1201.
(a) The Somerset County Board [shall be elected and] consists of [one]:
(1) ONE member elected from each commissioner district in the county;
AND
(2) ONE NONVOTING STUDENT MEMBER FROM EACH PUBLIC HIGH
SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY SELECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION.
(b) (1) A member from a commissioner district shall be a resident of that
district.
(2) A candidate for the county board shall be a registered voter of the
county.
(3) A member from a commissioner district who no longer resides in that
district may not continue as a member of the county board.
– 1 –

Ch. 150 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) [Members] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION,
MEMBERS of the board shall be elected at a general election as required by subsection (d)
of this section.
(d) (1) [Subject] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION, AND SUBJECT to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, each member
serves for a term of 4 years beginning on January 1 after the member’s election and until a
successor is elected and qualifies.
(2) (i) The terms of members are staggered as provided in this
paragraph.
(ii) 1. The members elected at the 2004 election from
commissioner districts 1, 3, and 5 shall serve an initial term of 2 years.
2. An election shall be conducted in 2006 and every 4 years
thereafter.
(iii) 1. The members elected at the 2004 election from
commissioner districts 2 and 4 shall serve an initial term of 4 years.
2. An election shall be conducted in 2008 and every 4 years
thereafter.
(3) The [Governor] COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF SOMERSET COUNTY
shall appoint a qualified individual to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of
the term and until a successor is elected and qualifies.
(e) (1) The State Board may remove a member of the county board for:
(i) Immorality;
(ii) Misconduct in office;
(iii) Incompetency; or
(iv) Willful neglect of duty.
(2) Before removing a member, the State Board shall send the member a
copy of the charges against him and give him an opportunity within 10 days to request a
hearing.
(3) If the member requests a hearing within the 10–day period:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 150
(i) The State Board promptly shall hold a hearing, but a hearing
may not be set within 10 days after the State Board sends the member a notice of the
hearing; and
(ii) The member shall have an opportunity to be heard publicly
before the State Board in his own defense, in person or by counsel.
(4) A member removed under this subsection has the right to a de novo
review of the removal by the Circuit Court for Somerset County.
(F) (1) A STUDENT MEMBER SHALL:
(I) BE A 12TH GRADE STUDENT IN THE SOMERSET COUNTY
PUBLIC SCHOOL SYSTEM ELECTED BY THE HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS OF THE PUBLIC
SCHOOL THAT THE STUDENT ATTENDS, IN ACCORDANCE WITH PROCEDURES
ESTABLISHED BY THE SCHOOL SYSTEM;
(II) SERVE FOR 1 YEAR BEGINNING ON JULY 1 AFTER THE
ELECTION OF THE MEMBER;
(III) BE A NONVOTING MEMBER; AND
(IV) ADVISE THE COUNTY BOARD ON THE INTERESTS OF
STUDENTS.
(2) UNLESS INVITED TO ATTEND BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A
MAJORITY OF THE COUNTY BOARD, THE STUDENT MEMBERS MAY NOT ATTEND AN
EXECUTIVE SESSION.
3–1203.
(a) Annual compensation for the board is as follows:
(1) Chairman – [$3,000] $6,000; and
(2) Member – [$2,700] $5,000.
(b) The chairman and other NONSTUDENT members are entitled to:
(1) Reimbursement for expenses incurred in official duties performed
outside Somerset County; and
(2) $500 per member per year for expenses incurred in official duties
performed within Somerset County.
– 3 –

Ch. 150 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3–1204.
(a) [All] EXCEPT FOR THOSE ACTIONS AUTHORIZED BY SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION, ALL final actions of the county board shall be taken at a public meeting.
(B) The board shall keep a formal record of each public meeting.
[(b) This section does not prohibit the board from meeting and deliberating in
executive session provided that all action is taken at a public meeting.]
(C) THE COUNTY BOARD MAY TAKE ACTIONS IN EXECUTIVE SESSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–305 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of a member of the Somerset County Board of Education while
serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions
of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the members of the Somerset County
Board of Education shall take effect at the beginning of the next following term of office.
This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or elected after the effective date
of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 4 –